Maine, session 132, LD231.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §2101, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2007, c. 583, §7, is further
amended to read:
1. Priorities. It is the policy of the State to plan for and implement an integrated
approach to solid waste management for solid waste generated in this State and solid waste
imported into this State, which must be based on the following order of priority:
A. Reduction of waste generated at the source, including both amount and toxicity of
the waste;
B. Reuse of waste;
B-1. Waste processing that reduces the volume of waste needing land disposal,
including incineration;
C. Recycling of waste;
D. Composting of biodegradable waste; and
E. Waste processing that reduces the volume of waste needing land disposal, including
incineration; and
F. Land disposal of waste.
It is the policy of the State to use the order of priority in this subsection as a guiding
principle in making decisions related to solid waste management.